Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,118
Obligee; rights.

An obligee of a housing agency, in addition to all other rights conferred on the obligee, subject only to any contractual restrictions binding upon the obligee, may:

(1) By mandamus or other action or proceeding for legal or equitable remedies, compel the housing agency and its representatives to perform each and every term, provision, and covenant contained in any contract of the housing agency with or for the benefit of such obligee, and require the carrying out of all covenants and agreements of the housing agency and the fulfillment of all duties imposed upon the housing agency by the Nebraska Housing Agency Act; and

(2) By action or proceeding, enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful or which violate any rights of the obligee.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 47.